Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2162
Alternative writ; answer.

On the return day of the alternative writ, or such further day as the court may allow, the party on whom the writ shall have been served may show cause, by answer made, in the same manner as an answer to a complaint in a civil action.

R.S.1867, Code § 651, p. 508;

R.S.1913, § 8277;

C.S.1922, § 9230;

C.S.1929, § 20-2162;

R.S.1943, § 25-2162;

Laws 2002, LB 876, § 40.

The alternative writ and answer thereto constitute the pleadings. State ex rel. Krieger v. Board of Supervisors of Clay County, 171 Neb. 117, 105 N.W.2d 721 (1960).